Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2503
Poisons; sale; duty of vendor to record in Poison Register.

Every person who disposes of or sells at retail or furnishes any of the poisons in section 71-2501 or any other poisons which the Department of Health and Human Services may from time to time designate, as provided in section 71-2506, shall, before delivery, enter in a book kept for that purpose, to be known as the Poison Register, the date of sale, the name and address of the purchaser, the name and quantity of the poison, the purpose for which it is purchased, and the name of the dispenser, and such record shall be signed by the person to whom the poison is delivered. Such record shall be kept in the form prescribed by the department, and the book containing the same must be always open for inspection by the proper authorities, and must be preserved for at least two years after the last entry.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 563;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-627;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 626;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 545.